North Dakota, session 69, HB1007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from federal funds, to the department of labor and
human rights for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the department of labor and human rights,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $2,787,854 $416,083 $3,203,937
New and vacant FTE pool 0 67,629 67,629
Operating expenses 378,407 8,964 387,371
Total all funds $3,166,261 $492,676 $3,658,937
Less other funds 511,925 36,498 548,423
Total general fund $2,654,336 $456,178 $3,110,514
Full-time equivalent positions 13.00 0.00 13.00
SECTION 2. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
department of labor and human rights may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE
pool line item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer
funds from the new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance
with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-
ninth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1007 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1007.
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 1 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State